src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-PstAct-deverbals_gt-norm.yaml
    делать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: делав
    делать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: делав
    делать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: делавши
    делать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: делавши
    делать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: делавший
    делать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: делавший
    сделать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сделав
    сделать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: сделав
    сделать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: сделавши
    сделать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: сделавши
    сделать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сделавший
    сделать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сделавший
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: читав
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: читав
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: читавши
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: читавши
    читать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читавший
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читавший
    читать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читавшийся
    читаться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: читавшийся
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: прочитав
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: прочитав
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочитавши
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочитавши
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавший
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прочитавший
    терять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: теряв
    терять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: теряв
    терять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: терявши
    терять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: терявши
    терять+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: терявший
    терять+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: терявший
    потерять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: потеряв
    потерять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: потеряв
    потерять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: потерявши
    потерять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: потерявши
    потерять+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: потерявший
    потерять+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: потерявший
    жалеть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жалев
    жалеть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жалев
    жалеть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жалевши
    жалеть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: жалевши
    жалеть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жалевший
    жалеть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жалевший
    пожалеть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: пожалев
    пожалеть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: пожалев
    пожалеть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: пожалевши
    пожалеть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: пожалевши
    пожалеть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пожалевший
    пожалеть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пожалевший
    стараться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: старавшись
    стараться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: старавшийся
    постараться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: постаравшись
    постараться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: постаравшийся
    требовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: требовав
    требовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: требовав
    требовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: требовавши
    требовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: требовавши
    требовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: требовавший
    требовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: требовавший
    потребовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: потребовав
    потребовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: потребовав
    потребовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: потребовавши
    потребовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: потребовавши
    потребовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: потребовавший
    потребовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: потребовавший
    рисовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: рисовав
    рисовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: рисовав
    рисовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: рисовавши
    рисовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: рисовавши
    рисовать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рисовавший
    рисовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рисовавший
    рисовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рисовавшийся
    рисоваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рисовавшийся
    нарисовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: нарисовав
    нарисовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: нарисовав
    нарисовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: нарисовавши
    нарисовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: нарисовавши
    нарисовать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: нарисовавший
    нарисовать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: нарисовавший
    тушевать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: тушевав
    тушевать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: тушевав
    тушевать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: тушевавши
    тушевать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: тушевавши
    тушевать+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тушевавший
    тушевать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тушевавший
    затушевать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: затушевав
    затушевать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: затушевав
    затушевать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: затушевавши
    затушевать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: затушевавши
    затушевать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: затушевавший
    затушевать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: затушевавший
    радоваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: радовавшись
    радовать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: радовавшийся
    радоваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: радовавшийся
    обрадоваться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: обрадовавшись
    обрадоваться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: обрадовавшийся
    вытянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: вытянув
    вытянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: вытянув
    вытянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вытянувши
    вытянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вытянувши
    вытянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вытянувший
    вытянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вытянувший
    тронуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: тронув
    тронуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: тронув
    тронуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: тронувши
    тронуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: тронувши
    тронуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тронувший
    тронуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тронувший
    гнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: гнув
    гнуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: гнув
    гнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гнувши
    гнуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гнувши
    гнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гнувший
    гнуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гнувший
    гнуться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: гнувшись
    гнуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гнувшийся
    гнуться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гнувшийся
    согнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: согнув
    согнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: согнув
    согнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: согнувши
    согнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: согнувши
    согнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: согнувший
    согнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: согнувший
    согнуться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: согнувшись
    согнуться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: согнувшийся
    тянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: тянув
    тянуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: тянув
    тянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: тянувши
    тянуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: тянувши
    тянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тянувший
    тянуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тянувший
    тянуть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тянувшийся
    тянуться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: тянувшийся
    натянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: натянув
    натянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: натянув
    натянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: натянувши
    натянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: натянувши
    натянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: натянувший
    натянуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: натянувший
    остыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: остыв
    остыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: остывши
    остынуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: остынув
    остынуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: остынувши
    остынуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: остывший
    остыть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: остывший
    вянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: вянув
    вянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: вянувши
    вянуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вянувший
    завянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: завянув
    завянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: завянувши
    завянуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: завянувший
    стынуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: стынув
    стынуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: стынувши
    стынуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: стынувший
    погибнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: погибнув
    погибнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: погибнувши
    погибнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: погибши
    погибнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: погибший
    возникнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: возникнув
    возникнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: возникнувши
    возникнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: возникши
    возникнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: возникнувший
    возникнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: возникший
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: отвергнув
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: отвергнув
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: отвергнувши
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: отвергнувши
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: отвергши
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: отвергши
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: отвергнувший
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: отвергнувший
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отвергший
    отвергнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отвергший
    достигнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: достигнув
    достигнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: достигнув
    достичь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: достигнув
    достичь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: достигнув
    достигнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: достигнувши
    достигнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: достигнувши
    достичь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: достигнувши
    достичь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: достигнувши
    достигнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: достигши
    достигнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: достигши
    достичь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: достигши
    достичь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: достигши
    достигнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: достигнувший
    достигнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: достигнувший
    достичь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: достигнувший
    достичь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac: достигнувший
    достигнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: достигший
    достигнуть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: достигший
    достичь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: достигший
    достичь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: достигший
    исчезнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: исчезнув
    исчезнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: исчезнувши
    исчезнуть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: исчезнувший
    гибнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: гибнув
    гибнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: гибнувши
    гибнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: гибнувший
    волгнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: волгнув
    волгнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: волгнувши
    волгнуть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: волгнувший
    свыкнуться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: свыкшись
    свыкнуться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: свыкшийся
    выпросить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выпросив
    выпросить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выпросив
    выпросить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпросивши
    выпросить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпросивши
    выпросить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпросивший
    выпросить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выпросивший
    строить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: строив
    строить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: строив
    строить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: строив
    строить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: строив
    строить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: строивши
    строить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: строивши
    строить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: строивши
    строить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: строивши
    строить+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строивший
    строить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строивший
    строить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строивший
    строить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строивший
    строить+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строившийся
    строиться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: строившийся
    построить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: построив
